North Dakota, session 69, HB1041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 61-16.1-53 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
61-16.1-53. Removal of a noncomplying dike, dam, or other device - Notice and hearing -
Appeal - Injunction.
1. Upon receipt of a complaint of unauthorized construction of a dike, dam, or other device for
water conservation, flood control, regulation, watershed improvement, or storage of water, the
water resource board shall promptly investigate and make a determination thereon. If the
board determines that a dike, dam, or other device, capable of retaining, obstructing, or
diverting more than fifty acre-feet [61674.08 cubic meters] of water or twenty-five acre-feet
[30837.04 cubic meters] of water for a medium-hazard or high-hazard dam, has been
established or constructed by a landowner or tenant contrary to this title or any rules adopted
by the board, the board shall notify the landowner by certified mail at the landowner's
post-office address of record. A copy of the notice must also be sent to the tenant, if any. The
notice must specify the nature and extent of the noncompliance and must state that if the dike,
dam, or other device is not removed within the period the board determines, but not less than
fifteen days, the board shall cause the removal of the dike, dam, or other device and assess
the cost of the removal, or the portion the board determines, against the property of the
landowner responsible. The notice must also state that the affected landowner, within fifteen
days of the date the notice is mailed, may demand, in writing, a hearing upon the matter. Upon
receipt of the demand, the board shall set a hearing date within fifteen days from the date the
demand is received. In the event of an emergency, the board may immediately apply to the
appropriate district court for an injunction prohibiting the landowner or tenant from constructing
or maintaining the dike, dam, or other device, or ordering the landowner to remove the dike,
dam, or other device. Assessments levied under this section must be collected in the same
manner as other assessments authorized by this chapter. If, in the opinion of the board, more
than one landowner or tenant has been responsible, the costs may be assessed on a pro rata
basis in proportion to the responsibility of the landowners. If a complaint is frivolous in the
discretion of the board, the board may assess the costs of the frivolous complaint against the
complainant.
2. Following removal of an unauthorized dike, dam, or other device, either by a water resource
board or by a party complying with an order of a water resource board, the board may assess
its costs against the property of the responsible landowner.

H. B. NO. 1041 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1041.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 2 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State